Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1

Temporary Assistance

71-3-101. Short title.

This may be cited as the “Families First Act of 1996.”

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 2; T.C.A., §71-3-151.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-151 was transferred to §71-3-101 by the code commission in 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. Families first relative caregiver project, OAG 99-176, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 132 (9/10/99).

71-3-102. Program subject to availability of federal funds.

Continuation of the families first program is subject to, and limited by, the availability of federal funds that may be made available to the state of Tennessee by congress and the United States department of health and human services, or its successor agency.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 3; T.C.A., §71-3-152.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-152 was transferred to §71-3-102 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assistance” means, unless otherwise required by the context, temporary assistance;

“Caretaker relative” means the father, mother, grandfather or grandmother of any degree, brother or sister of the whole or half-blood, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, aunt or uncle of any degree, first cousin, nephew or niece, the relatives by adoption within the previously named classes of persons, and the biological relatives within the previous degrees of relationship, and the legal spouses of persons within the previously named classes of persons, even if the marriage has been terminated by death or divorce, with whom a child is living;

“Child” or “children” means:

A person or persons under eighteen (18) years of age; or

A person who has not attained nineteen (19) years of age and who is a full-time student in a secondary school or the equivalent and who is expected to graduate by the nineteenth birthday;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Dependent child” means, except as otherwise stated in this part, a child living with a caretaker relative if the child is deprived of parental support due to death of a parent, continued absence of a parent from the home, physical or mental incapacity of a parent, or unemployment or underemployment of either or both parents and if the child's legally responsible relatives are not able to provide adequate care and support of such child without temporary assistance;

“Family” means the eligible unit of children and parent or parents or caretaker relative or relatives residing in a common residence; and

“Temporary assistance” means the program to provide economic support and other support services to families that is provided by the state utilizing funds made available by congress and the secretary of health and human services to the state pursuant to the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), and any state funds that may be appropriated by the general assembly designated to support the temporary assistance program. If at any time, federal funds are not available to provide the continuation of the temporary assistance program, the state shall not be obligated to continue the program by using only state funds.

It is the intent of the general assembly that any welfare program administered by the state shall be in compliance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.), and regulations promulgated pursuant to that act, and all other applicable federal civil rights legislation.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 4; T.C.A., §71-3-153.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-153 was transferred to §71-3-103 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-104. Eligibility for temporary assistance.

A family shall be eligible for temporary assistance pursuant to this part if:

A dependent child resides in this state with a caretaker relative in that family, or an individual who applies for temporary assistance is pregnant, or as otherwise defined by the department;

The family meets income standards based upon the standard of need for a family based upon its size and income and based upon resource limits as determined by the department in its rules;

The family members are engaged in work activities as set forth in subsection (g), except as exempted by this part or by rule of the department;

The caretaker relative has agreed to and complies with a personal responsibility plan as developed by the department in accordance with subsection (h); and

The family or individual of the family is otherwise eligible pursuant to federal or state laws or regulations.

A caretaker relative who becomes ineligible for any reason other than a failure to comply with work requirements or to cooperate with child support obligations shall be eligible for transitional childcare assistance for a period specified by the department while the caretaker relative is employed, in school, or in employment training. Childcare assistance terminated due to failure to comply with work requirements shall be reinstated upon verification by the department that the work requirements were, in fact, being met immediately preceding such ineligibility. Childcare assistance shall be paid, on a sliding fee scale based upon the family's income for so long as federal funding or any related waiver is in effect.

Food stamp assistance shall continue to be available to these families as prescribed by federal or state law or regulations.

A family that becomes financially ineligible for temporary assistance due to an increase in a caretaker relative's earned income, but continues to meet all other eligibility criteria, including compliance with the program's work requirements, shall be eligible for transitional temporary assistance for no more than six (6) months.

The amount of the transitional temporary assistance shall be based upon the family's income and household size.

Receipt of transitional temporary assistance shall count toward the recipient's maximum time limit under subsection (d).

The department is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this subdivision (b)(3) in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Persons who are recipients of temporary assistance and who marry while receiving such assistance may disregard the new spouse in determining eligibility for three (3) months after the date of marriage.

Except as provided in this part or as otherwise required by federal law, no family shall receive assistance if that family includes an adult who has received temporary assistance from this program or the program of any other state or territory for a total of sixty (60) months, whether or not consecutive, unless an exemption is granted pursuant to this part.

As to a child who was not the head of a household or who was not married to the head of a household, the sixty (60) month time limit stated in subdivision (d)(1) shall not begin to run during the time that the child was a member of a family receiving assistance under this part.

A family shall be eligible for temporary assistance beyond the sixty-month time limit stated in subdivision (d)(1) if:

The family does not contain an adult;

The caretaker relative is sixty-five (65) years of age or older;

The caretaker relative is caring for a disabled or incapacitated child relative or disabled adult relative, based upon criteria set forth in the department's rules;

The caretaker relative is disabled, based upon criteria set forth in the department's rules; or

As otherwise required by federal and state laws or regulations.

The exemptions in subdivision (d)(3) are subject to the limitations for the percentages of individuals allowed to receive temporary assistance beyond sixty (60) months.

No payment of assistance shall be made for an individual who is not the head of a household, who has not reached eighteen (18) years of age, who has a child who is at least sixteen (16) weeks of age in the person's care, and who has not successfully completed a high school education or its equivalent, unless the individual participates in educational activities directed toward the attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent.

No payment of assistance shall be made to an individual who is head of a household, who has not reached twenty (20) years of age, who has a child who is at least sixteen (16) weeks of age in the person's care, and who has not successfully completed a high school education or its equivalent unless the individual participates in:

Educational activities directed toward the attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent; or

Thirty (30) hours of countable work activities as delineated in subsection (g).

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), if a person applying for assistance under this chapter is under eighteen (18) years of age, has never married, and is either pregnant or has the applicant's child in the applicant's care, the applicant is not eligible for assistance if:

The applicant and the applicant's child or children do not live in a place maintained by the applicant's parent, legal guardian, or other adult relative as such person's own home or other suitable living arrangement as otherwise defined by rule of the department; and

The department determines after investigation that the physical or emotional health or safety of the person applying for assistance or the dependent child or children would not be jeopardized if the applicant and the dependent child or children were required to live in one of the situations described in subdivision (f)(1)(A).

Subdivision (f)(1) does not apply if:

The person applying for assistance has no parent, legal guardian or other adult relative whose whereabouts are known;

No parent, legal guardian or other adult relative of the person applying for assistance allows the person to live in the home of that parent, legal guardian or other adult relative as determined by the department's verification; or

The department otherwise determines that there is good cause not to apply subdivision (f)(1).

All family members who are not otherwise exempt pursuant to rules of the department and who receive temporary assistance pursuant to this part shall engage in work, training or educational activities. The department shall define the types of activities by rule. These activities may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Employment;

Work experience activities;

On-the-job training;

Job search and job readiness assistance;

Community service programs;

Vocational educational training;

Job skills and educational training related directly to employment;

Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalency; and

Satisfactory attendance at a secondary school, in the case of a recipient who:

Has not completed secondary school; and

Is a dependent child or a head of a household who is nineteen (19) years of age or younger.

As a condition of eligibility, an applicant for or a recipient of temporary assistance must agree to a personal responsibility plan developed by the department in direct consultation with the applicant or recipient. For all applicants or recipients who are not exempt from the work requirements established by this part, an individualized career plan shall be developed establishing goal-oriented work activities designed to provide the applicant or recipient with an opportunity to move toward self-sufficiency. Supportive services determined essential to successful engagement in the work activities shall be provided. At least once each twelve (12) months throughout the period of continuous temporary assistance provided pursuant to this part, the department shall monitor and evaluate the personal responsibility plan to promote the recipient's success in gaining self-sufficiency.

The personal responsibility plan shall require participation in personal responsibility activities as set forth in subsection (g). The department may provide either a parent education training class for parents or caretakers of children in pre-kindergarten through third grade (pre-K-3) or a program of volunteer service in school in which a parent or caretaker relative who is a recipient of temporary assistance under this part may agree to participate.

The personal responsibility plan shall also require the parent or other caretaker relative, regardless of age or disabling status, to enter a plan that requires, but is not limited to, the following:

The children in the family attend school;

No payment of temporary assistance shall be made to an individual for ten (10) years from the date of conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere of that individual in a federal or state court for having made a fraudulent statement or representation with respect to the place of residence of the individual in order to receive assistance simultaneously from two (2) or more states under the temporary assistance program under this part, TennCare or any program of medical services under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), the Food Stamp Act of 1977 (7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.), or under the supplemental security income program under Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.).

No payment of assistance shall be made to an individual who is fleeing to avoid prosecution or custody or confinement after conviction under the laws of the place from which the individual flees, for a crime, or an attempt to commit a crime, that is a felony under the laws of the place from which an individual flees, or that, in the case of the state of New Jersey, is a high misdemeanor under the laws of such state, or who is violating a condition of probation or parole imposed by federal or state law.

Pursuant to the option granted the state by 21 U.S.C. § 862a(d), an individual convicted on or before June 30, 2011, under federal or state law of a felony involving possession, use or distribution of a controlled substance shall be exempt from the prohibition contained in 21 U.S.C. § 862a(a) against eligibility for families first program benefits for such convictions, if such person, as determined by the department:

(a) Is currently participating in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services;

(i) (a) Is currently participating in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services;

Is currently enrolled in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services, but is subject to a waiting list to receive available treatment, and the individual remains enrolled in the treatment program and enters the treatment program at the first available opportunity;

Has satisfactorily completed a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services; or

Is determined by a treatment provider licensed by the department of mental health and substance abuse services not to need substance abuse treatment according to TennCare guidelines; and

Is complying with, or has already complied with, all obligations imposed by the criminal court, including any substance abuse treatment obligations.

Eligibility based upon the factors in subdivision (k)(2)(A) must be based upon documentary or other evidence satisfactory to the department, and the applicant must meet all other factors of program eligibility, including, specifically, being accountable for the requirements of the personal responsibility plan required by this part.

Notwithstanding subdivision (k)(2)(A) or (k)(2)(B) to the contrary, no person convicted of a Class A felony for violating a provision of title 39, chapter 17, part 4 shall be eligible for the exemptions provided by subdivision (k)(2)(A) or (k)(2)(B).

Pursuant to the option granted the state by 21 U.S.C. § 862a(d), an individual convicted on or after July 1, 2011, under federal or state law of a felony involving possession, use or distribution of a controlled substance shall be exempt from the prohibition contained in 21 U.S.C. § 862a(a) against eligibility for families first program benefits for such convictions, if such person meets the following requirements:

Requirements contained in subdivision (k)(2)(A) or (k)(2)(B) and (C);

If treatment was prescribed according to the requirements in subdivision (k)(2)(A) or (k)(2)(B), successful completion of a substance abuse program must occur within three (3) attempts. If such person does not complete the originally prescribed treatment program within three (3) attempts, the individual shall be ineligible for a period of three (3) years.

Pursuant to the option granted the state by 21 U.S.C. § 862a(d), an individual convicted of a second drug felony under federal or state law of a felony involving possession, use or distribution of a controlled substance on or after July 1, 2011, shall not be eligible for families first program benefits for a period of three (3) years from the date of conviction.

No payment of assistance pursuant to this part shall be made for an illegal alien in a family.

The children in the family receive immunizations and health checks; and

The parent or caretaker relative cooperate in the establishment and enforcement of child support, including, but not limited to, the naming of the father of a child for purposes of paternity establishment, unless good cause not to cooperate exists, as defined by the department.

The personal responsibility plan shall include requirements, if the need is identified relative to the child, that:

The parent or a suitable adult or guardian shall attend two (2) or more conferences within a year with the child's teacher to review the child's status in school;

Attend at least eight (8) hours of parenting classes; or

The parent shall participate in such support services that the child may need as determined by the department to overcome any school, family, or other barriers that may interfere with the child's and the family's ability to be successful.

(i) Unless exempt, refusal or failure to engage in full-time employment, part-time employment or other training or other work preparation activities as set forth in subsection (g), without good cause, or the failure to cooperate in the establishment or enforcement of child support without good cause, shall result in denial of eligibility for, or termination of, temporary assistance for the entire family unit.

Failure to comply with the personal responsibility plan as required under subdivisions (h)(2)(B)(i) and (ii), without good cause, shall result in a percentage reduction with regard to the temporary assistance payment in the amount of twenty percent (20%) until such time as compliance occurs.

The personal responsibility plan may provide transportation assistance, if needed to participate in required activities; provided, that the department shall first utilize available community transportation resources before providing such assistance from department funds. The department shall provide childcare services for those individuals who are receiving benefits, participating in work activities delineated in subsection (g), and not exempt from work activities pursuant to this part.

The work requirements shall be excused for:

A parent or caretaker relative who proves to the satisfaction of the department the existence of the person's temporary incapacity or permanent disability;

A parent or caretaker relative who proves to the satisfaction of the department that the person must provide personal care for a disabled relative child or adult relative living in the home;

A single parent with a child under sixteen (16) weeks of age;

A person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older;

A nonparental caretaker relative who chooses not to be included in the assistance group; and

Other exemptions that may be required by federal law or regulation, as well as other exemptions that may be established by rule of the department in order to promote the purposes of this part.

If, without good cause, a recipient of temporary assistance fails to comply with a child support or work plan requirement imposed by this part or prescribed within the personal responsibility plan, then the family shall be subject to appropriate sanction by the department, which may include termination of assistance for a period to be determined by the department.

The maximum payment standard for a family shall not be increased for a child who is born to a caretaker relative of a temporary assistance unit who, as determined by the statement of a physician, becomes pregnant while receiving temporary assistance, or as otherwise defined by regulation of the department; provided, that if the family loses eligibility for any reason other than a failure to cooperate with the department or a failure to comply with the personal responsibility plan and if the family subsequently becomes eligible again for temporary assistance, then the department shall base the maximum payment standard on the actual size of the family unit including such child.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 5; 1999, ch. 520, § 47; 2000, ch. 981, § 76; 2002, ch. 715, § 1; 2007, ch. 31, §§ 1-8; 2009, ch. 186, § 38; 2010, ch. 1056, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 135; 2011, ch. 221, § 1; T.C.A., §71-3-154; Acts 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 912, §§ 1-3; 2014, ch. 960, § 1; 2018, ch. 789, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-154 was transferred to §71-3-104 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 31, § 11 provided that the department shall have the authority to implement the provisions of the act by public necessity rules (now emergency rules) to become effective July 1, 2007; provided, that permanent rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled at Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2007, ch. 31, § 12 provided that the act shall not affect right and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2007.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2014, ch. 960, § 2 provided that the commissioner of human services is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A felony, §40-35-111.

71-3-105. Rules and regulations — Deductions — Reports to governor and general assembly — Miscellaneous provisions.

In determining eligibility under § 71-3-104 for, and amounts of, grants under the temporary assistance program, the department of human services shall adopt rules and regulations establishing a standard of need that reflects the true cost of the following, less any discounts for other sources of assistance provided for in subsection (b):

Safe, healthful housing;

Minimum clothing for health and decency;

A low cost adequate food budget as recommended by the United States department of agriculture's thrifty food plan (7 U.S.C. § 2012(u));

An allowance for essential medical care; and

Other necessary items including, but not limited to, transportation, personal care and educational expenses.

The department shall deduct from the costs determined in subsection (a) the value of the following:

Housing assistance programs;

Food coupons or food stamps or food assistance under chapter 5, part 3 of this title; and

TennCare or medicaid.

The commissioner shall report to the governor and the general assembly no later than October 1 of each year regarding projected annual adjustments to the standard of need necessitated by changes in the costs and benefits described in subsections (a) and (b). The report of the commissioner shall also contain:

An estimate of the percentage of the adjusted standard of need that could be paid if the appropriation for the next fiscal year were to remain constant;

An estimate of the cost of paying the same percentage of the standard of need considering necessary adjustments in such standard of need;

The recommendation of the commissioner as to the percentage of the adjusted standard of need that should be paid in the next fiscal year and the cost of that adjusted standard of need; and

Any other relevant information that would be helpful to the governor and the general assembly in making decisions concerning the temporary assistance program.

Any amount of earned income in an aid-to-the-blind case, as provided in § 71-4-105, and any other income required by federal statutes to be exempt in determining need, shall be exempt and shall not be considered as a resource in determining the amount of assistance to be paid to any person under this part.

The standard of need for each fiscal year shall be established by rule on July 1 of each year in accordance with subsections (a) and (b).

The department of human services shall conduct a temporary assistance client characteristics study at least once every three (3) years. The study shall be conducted either by contract or within the department and shall be completed prior to any review, required by federal regulation, of the temporary assistance standard of need and temporary assistance grant payments.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f)(2)(B), the maximum grants for the temporary assistance program, expressed as a percentage of the standard of need, may be raised if approved as a line item in the annual appropriations act. An increase in the maximum grants for the temporary assistance program shall not be approved by rules.

The maximum standard grant for the temporary assistance program shall be determined as follows:

For an assistance group size of one (1) person, the maximum standard grant shall be twenty-two percent (22%) of the fiscal year 2018-2019 standard of need for an assistance group size of one (1) person; and

For each additional member added to an assistance group, an additional two percent (2%) shall be added to twenty-two percent (22%), and the maximum standard grant for each respective assistance group size shall be the resulting percentage of the fiscal year 2018-2019 standard of need for that assistance group size.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this subsection (f) in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

In determining eligibility under § 71-3-104, the department shall adopt rules that use the standard of need less any exemption provided by subsection (d) to determine eligibility for amounts of grants. Such rules shall be adopted in a manner in which the maximum amount of child support and other income may be provided to the family and children without loss of grant and medicaid benefits.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 6; 2010, ch. 1030, § 19; T.C.A., §71-3-155; Acts 2018, ch. 789, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-155 was transferred to §71-3-105 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-106. [Reserved.]

The department shall administer the families first program established by this part.

The commissioner has the authority to organize the department in any manner necessary as permitted by law, to establish any necessary county or district or regional offices and to appoint area and district managers and directors in those offices or in the department's state office, and to establish any necessary internal policies and procedures for the proper administration of the families first program and for the provision of temporary assistance, child support, jobs programs and other related support services.

From time to time, the commissioner may appoint committees composed of representatives from the public or private sectors, or both, for such purpose and duration as may be deemed appropriate or required. Members of such committees shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses for attending meetings of their respective committees. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The department shall administer the program of economic assistance to families under Titles IV-A (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), IV-D (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), and IV-F (repealed) of the Social Security Act or related federal laws or regulations as they may continue to exist pursuant to federal statutes and regulations on or after September 1, 1996, and as such program statutes and regulations may be amended, or pursuant to any waivers that are granted by the federal government from those regulations as a result of the enactment of this legislation.

Acting in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the department shall have rulemaking authority to establish any necessary rules for the administration of this part and shall have rulemaking authority to establish any rules to carry out the requirements of any title or part of any title that the department administers and that are necessary to immediately implement this part to effect any federal legislative changes.

The department shall establish by rule the procedures for provision of notice of the eligibility determination to the applicant or recipient as well as the grievance and appeal procedures that are applicable to meet due process. It is the intent of this section that grievance and appeals procedures available pursuant to this part, and of chapter 5, part 12 of this title shall not be more narrow than such procedures available to recipients of assistance upon August 31, 1996. The department shall also establish by rule, administrative procedures through which a recipient shall be granted an extension of temporary assistance, beyond the maximum eighteen-month period and the maximum sixty-month period set forth in § 71-3-104(d), for “good cause” or based upon the failure of the state to timely provide essential child care, transportation, education or job training services prescribed within the recipient's personal responsibility plan.

All other agencies of the state shall cooperate with the department in any manner necessary for the administration of this part.

Each governmental entity of the state, directly affected by any permanent rule promulgated by the department of human services to implement this part and of chapter 5, part 12 of this title, shall review such permanent rule not later than fourteen (14) calendar days after the rule is filed with the secretary of state. Prior to such deadline, the affected governmental entity shall submit written comments to the secretary of state for filing with the applicable rule and for distribution to the chair of the government operations committee of the senate and to the chair of the government operations committee of the house of representatives. Such written comments shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the impact of such permanent rule upon the existing rules, policies or procedures of the affected governmental entity.

The commissioner of human services shall develop a written plan or statement providing for interagency coordination of services provided under this part and chapter 5, part 12 of this title, which shall include services provided by the departments of human services, education, labor and workforce development, and transportation.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 8; 1999, ch. 520, § 47; 2000, ch. 981, § 68; 2009, ch. 103, § 2; T.C.A., §71-3-157.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-157 was transferred to §71-3-107 by the code commission in 2012.Former subdivision (e)(2) was deleted by the code commission in 2004. Subdivision (e)(2) read: “In order to comply with this section's September 1, 1996, effective date, the department may implement its rulemaking authority through promulgation of public necessity rules (now emergency rules) in accordance with §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). Upon delivering a draft of any such public necessity rules (now emergency rules) to the attorney general and reporter for approval as required by such section, the department shall simultaneously deliver a copy of such draft public necessity rules (now emergency rules) to the chair of the government operations committee of the senate and to the chair of the government operations committee of the house of representatives.”

Compiler's Notes. Former title IV-F of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, formerly compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 681 et seq, was repealed effective July 1, 1997.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.